Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 15 Title Pledges
45-15-114. Twenty-day holding period — Procedure for redemption or failure to redeem — Loss of agreement by pledgor.

Upon expiration of a property pledge agreement and the final renewal of the agreement, if any, the title pledge lender shall retain possession of the titled personal property and the certificate of title for at least twenty (20) days. If the pledgor fails to redeem the titled personal property and the certificate of title before the lapse of the twenty-day holding period, the pledgor shall thereby forfeit all right, title and interest in and to the titled personal property to the title pledge lender, who shall thereby acquire an absolute right of title to the titled personal property, and the title pledge lender shall have the right and authority to sell or dispose of the unredeemed pledged property.

The title pledge lender has, upon default by the pledgor of any obligation pursuant to the title pledge agreement, the right to take possession of the titled personal property. In taking possession, the title pledge lender or the lender's agent may proceed without judicial process if this can be done without breach of the peace; or, if necessary, may proceed by action to obtain judicial process. After taking possession of the titled personal property, the title pledge lender shall retain possession of the titled personal property and the certificate of title for a twenty-day holding period. There shall be no further interest or other fees charged to the pledgor from the commencement of the twenty-day holding period.

If, during the twenty-day holding period, the pledgor pays the repossession charge, and redeems the titled personal property and certificate of title, by paying all outstanding principal, interest and fees authorized by this chapter owed by the pledgor to the title pledge lender, the pledgor shall be given possession of the titled personal property and the certificate of title without further charge.

If the pledgor fails to redeem the titled personal property and certificate of title during the twenty-day holding period, then the title pledge lender shall have a period of sixty (60) days in which to sell the titled personal property in a commercially reasonable manner. For purposes of this section, “commercially reasonable” is a sale that would be commercially reasonable under title 47, chapter 9, part 6. The proceeds of the commercially reasonable sale shall be applied to the principal, interest and all fees authorized by this chapter owed by the pledgor to the title pledge lender, including the actual direct costs of the sale. Any surplus from the sale of the titled personal property shall be remitted to the pledgor after the sale, and shall not be retained by the title pledge lender. The commissioner shall prescribe by rule the manner in which the title pledge lender shall remit any surplus to the pledgor.

If the pledgor loses the title pledge agreement or property pledge agreement or other evidence of the transaction, the pledgor shall not thereby forfeit the right to redeem the pledged property, but may promptly, before the lapse of the redemption date, make affidavit for the loss, describing the pledged property, which affidavit shall, in all respects, replace and be substituted for the lost evidence of the pledge transaction.

Acts 1995, ch. 186, § 13; 2005, ch. 440, § 11.

Attorney General Opinions. Both title pledge lenders and other secured parties must comply with the applicable statutes governing motor vehicles, OAG 05-111, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (7/12/05).

45-15-115. Prohibited actions by lender.

A title pledge lender shall not:

Accept a pledge from a person less than eighteen (18) years of age, or from anyone who appears to be intoxicated;

Make any agreement giving the title pledge lender any recourse against the pledgor, other than the title pledge lender's right to take possession of the titled personal property and certificate of title upon the pledgor's default or failure to redeem, and to sell or otherwise dispose of the titled personal property, in accordance with this chapter;

Enter into a title pledge agreement in which the amount of money loaned, when combined with the outstanding balance of other outstanding title pledge agreements the pledgor has with the same lender secured by any single certificate of title, exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or enter into a property pledge agreement in which the amount of money loaned exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500);

Accept any waiver, in writing or otherwise, of any right or protection accorded a pledgor under this chapter;

Fail to exercise reasonable care to protect from loss or damage titled personal property or certificate of title in the physical possession of the title pledge lender;

Purchase pledged titled personal property that was repossessed in the operation of the lender's business;

Maintain more than one (1) title pledge office or place of operation for each title pledge lender under each license; provided, however, that the title pledge lender may move from one (1) place of business to another, as permitted in § 45-15-109(a)(1);

Keep open any title pledge office before eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.), or after six o'clock p.m. (6:00 p.m.), on any day during the year, with the exception of November 25 through December 24 of each year. During that period, a title pledge lender may open the place of business at eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 am.), and shall be entitled to close at nine o'clock p.m. (9:00 p.m.). No title pledge lender shall be open on Sunday. Nothing in this subdivision (8) prohibits a title pledge lender from accepting a payment pursuant to an existing title pledge or property pledge agreement at any time;

Enter into a pledge agreement, unless the pledgor presents a clear title to titled personal property at the time that the loan is made, and the title is retained, after noting of the lien by the state, in the physical possession of the title pledge lender. If the title pledge lender files a lien against the property without possession of a clear title to the property, the resulting lien shall be void;

Capitalize or add any accrued interest or fee to the original principal of the title pledge agreement or property pledge agreement during any renewal of the agreement;

Sell or otherwise charge for any type of insurance in connection with a title pledge agreement or property pledge agreement. Nothing in this subdivision (11) shall prohibit a title pledge lender from offering a pledgor the option to purchase memberships in automobile clubs or associations, as defined in § 55-18-101; provided, that the title pledge lender informs the pledgor in writing that the membership is optional, that the membership can be purchased elsewhere, and that the purchase of the membership has no bearing on whether the pledgor receives a loan;

Charge a prepayment penalty;

Advertise using the words “interest free loans” or “no finance charges,” or engage in any other false or misleading advertising;

Require a pledgor to provide any additional guaranty as a condition of entering into a title pledge agreement;

Use any collection tactics in violation of the federal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. § 1692 et seq.);

Renew or otherwise consolidate a title pledge agreement or property pledge agreement with the proceeds of another title pledge agreement or property pledge agreement made by the same title pledge lender;

Use any device or agreement, including agreements with affiliated title pledge lenders, with the intent to obtain greater charges than otherwise would be authorized by this chapter; or

Violate this chapter or any rule promulgated pursuant to this chapter by the commissioner.

Acts 1995, ch. 186, § 13; 1996, ch. 718, § 2; 1997, ch. 74, § 1; 2005, ch. 440, § 12; 2013, ch. 70, § 1.

45-15-116. Safekeeping of titled personal property or personal property certificates of title — Insurance coverage — Damaged property.

Every title pledge lender licensed under this chapter shall provide a safe place for the keeping of the pledged property. The title pledge lender shall have sufficient insurance coverage on the pledged property, in the event of loss or damage, for the benefit of the pledgor to pay the title pledge value of the pledged property as written on the title pledge or property pledge agreement; provided, that the personal property is in the physical possession of the title pledge lender. The insurance policy shall name the commissioner as an additional insured party for the protection and benefit of the pledgor. “Title pledge value,” for the purposes of this section, means the amount of money loaned in consideration of the pledged goods as stated on the title pledge or property pledge agreement.

Acts 1995, ch. 186, § 13; 2005, ch. 440, § 15.

45-15-117. Violations.

Any person who intentionally violates any provision of this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1995, ch. 186, § 13; 1996, ch. 718, § 3; 2005, ch. 440, § 13.

Cross-References. Penalty for a Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-15-118. Actions authorized by commissioner for violations — Consent orders — Penalties — Enforcement — Emergency action — Investigation of complaints — Censure, suspension, or bar.

If, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, the commissioner finds that a person has violated this chapter, or any administrative regulation issued pursuant to this chapter, the commissioner may take any or all of the following actions:

Order the person to cease and desist violating the chapter or any administrative rules issued pursuant to the chapter;

Require the refund of any fees collected by the person in violation of this chapter; and

Order the person to pay the commissioner a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each transaction in violation of this chapter or each day that a violation has occurred and continues.

The commissioner may enter into consent orders at any time with any person, to resolve any matter arising under this chapter. A consent order shall be signed by the person to whom it is issued, or a duly authorized representative, and shall indicate agreement to the terms contained in the consent order. A consent order need not constitute an admission by any person that any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter, has been violated, nor need it constitute a finding by the commissioner that the person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter.

Notwithstanding the issuance of a consent order, the commissioner may seek civil or criminal penalties or compromise civil penalties concerning matters encompassed by the consent order.

In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the commissioner may take any enforcement action authorized by this chapter, without providing the opportunity for a prior hearing, but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon an application to rescind the action taken that is filed with the commissioner within twenty (20) days after receipt of the notice of the commissioner's emergency action.

Any person aggrieved by the conduct of a title pledge lender under this chapter, in connection with the title pledge lender's regulated activities, may file a written complaint with the commissioner, who may investigate the complaint.

In the course of the investigation of the complaint, the commissioner may:

Subpoena witnesses;

Administer oaths;

Examine any individual under oath; and

Compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts or other documents relevant to the investigation.

If any person fails to comply with a subpoena of the commissioner under this chapter, or to testify concerning any matter about which the person may be interrogated under this chapter, the commissioner may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for enforcement.

The license of any title pledge lender under this chapter, who fails to comply with a subpoena of the commissioner, may be suspended pending compliance with the subpoena.

The commissioner shall have exclusive administrative power to investigate and enforce any and all complaints filed by any person that are not criminal in nature, which complaint relates to the business of title pledge lending.

The commissioner, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may censure, suspend for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months, or bar a person from any position of employment, management or control of any title pledge lender, if the commissioner finds that the:

Censure, suspension, or bar is in the public interest and that the person has committed or caused a violation of this chapter or any rule, regulation or order of the commissioner; or

Person has been:

Convicted or pled guilty to, or pled nolo contendere to, any crime; or

Held liable in any civil action by final judgment, or any administrative judgment by any public agency, if the criminal, civil or administrative judgment involved any offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in the business, in accordance with this chapter.

Persons suspended or barred under this subsection (d) are prohibited from participating in any business activity of a title pledge lender and from engaging in any business activity on the premises where a title pledge lender is conducting its business. This subsection (d) shall not be construed to prohibit suspended or barred persons from having their personal transactions processed by a title pledge lender.

This subsection (d) shall apply to any violation, conviction, plea, or judgment on or after November 1, 2005.

Acts 1995, ch. 186, § 13; 2005, ch. 440, § 14.

45-15-119. Supersession of ordinances or resolutions of municipal corporations.

No incorporated municipality, city or taxing district in this state shall enact an ordinance or resolution or promulgate any rules or regulations relating to this chapter. Any ordinance or resolution or rules or regulations of any municipality, city or taxing district relative to title pledge lending are superseded by this chapter.

Acts 1995, ch. 186, § 13; 2005, ch. 440, § 16.

45-15-120. Applicability of motor vehicle provisions.

Title 55, chapter 17, shall apply to all sales and transfers of any motor vehicle acquired under this chapter.

Acts 1995, ch. 186, § 14.

45-15-121. Licensing through multi-state automated licensing system.

In addition to any other powers imposed upon the commissioner by law, the commissioner is authorized to require persons subject to this chapter to be licensed through a multi-state automated licensing system. Pursuant to this authority, the commissioner may:

Promulgate any rules reasonably necessary for participation in, transition to, or operation of, a multi-state automated licensing system;

Establish relationships or enter into agreements reasonably necessary for participation in, transition to, or operation of a multi-state automated licensing system. The agreements may include, but are not limited to, operating agreements, information sharing agreements, interstate cooperative agreements, and technology licensing agreements;

Require that applications for licensing under this chapter and renewals of such licenses be filed with a multi-state automated licensing system;

Require that any fees required to be paid under this chapter be paid through a multi-state automated licensing system;

Establish deadlines for transitioning licenses to a multi-state automated licensing system. The commissioner may deny any applications or renewal applications not filed with a multi-state automated licensing system after the deadlines have passed, notwithstanding any other deadlines established in this chapter. The commissioner shall provide reasonable notice of any transition deadlines to licensees; and

Take such further actions as are reasonably necessary to give effect to this section.

Nothing in this section authorizes the commissioner to require a person who is not subject to this chapter to submit information to, or participate in, a multi-state automated licensing system.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commissioner retains full authority and discretion to license persons under this chapter and to enforce this chapter, and nothing in this section reduces or derogates this authority and discretion.

Applicants for and holders of licenses issued under this chapter must pay all costs associated with submitting an application or transitioning a license to a multi-state automated licensing system, as well as all costs associated with maintaining and renewing any license issued by the commissioner on a multi-state automated licensing system.

Acts 2017, ch. 122, § 7.

45-15-122. Agent for channeling information.

The commissioner is authorized to use a multi-state automated licensing system as an agent for channeling information, whether criminal or noncriminal in nature, and whether derived from or distributed to the United States department of justice, any other state or federal governmental agency, or any other source, that the commissioner is authorized to request or distribute under this chapter.

Acts 2017, ch. 122, § 8.

45-15-123. Privacy or confidentiality of shared information.

In order to promote more effective regulation and reduce regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:

The requirements under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to a multi-state automated licensing system, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or material, continue to apply to the information or material after it has been disclosed to a multi-state automated licensing system. The information or material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with title pledge lending oversight authority without the loss of privilege or confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law, including the protection available under § 45-1-120;

For purposes of subdivision (1), the commissioner may enter into agreements or sharing agreements with other governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, or other associations representing governmental agencies, as established by rule, regulation, or order of the commissioner;

Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality protection under subdivision (1) is not subject to:

Disclosure under any federal or state law governing disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or agency of the federal government or the respective state; or

Subpoena or discovery or admission into evidence in any private civil action or administrative process, unless the person to whom such information or material pertains, in this person's discretion, waives any applicable privilege held by a multi-state automated licensing system, in whole or in part;

This section supersedes any inconsistent provisions of title 10, chapter 7, part 5, pertaining to the records open to public inspection; and

This section does not apply to information or material relating to publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against persons subject to this chapter that is included in a multi-state automated licensing system for access by the public.

Acts 2017, ch. 122, § 8.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.